District of Columbia statutes.
42-3403.06

Tenant rights.

The Mayor shall include tenant rights to relocation payments, relocation services, and housing assistance payments in the summary of tenant rights required for publication in the D.C. Register. When an owner sends notice of intent to convert a housing accommodation into a condominium or cooperative, the owner shall attach to that notice a summary of tenant rights under this subchapter and an application for relocation services and housing assistance payments as published in the D.C. Register by the Mayor.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 306, 27 DCR 2975
Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.
1981 Ed., § 45-1625.